Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Derivative Suits

§ 17-19-630.
Derivative suits.

A proceeding may be brought in the right of a domestic or foreign corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by:

Any member or members having five percent (5%) or more of the voting power or by fifty (50) members, whichever is less; or

Any director.

In any proceeding under this section, each complainant shall be a member or director at the time of bringing the proceeding.

A complaint in a proceeding brought in the right of a corporation shall be verified and allege with particularity the demand made, if any, to obtain action by the directors and either why the complainants could not obtain the action or why they did not make the demand. If a demand for action was made and the corporation’s investigation of the demand is in progress when the proceeding is filed, the court may stay the suit until the investigation is completed.

On termination of the proceeding the court may require the complainants to pay any defendant’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in defending the suit if it finds that the proceeding was commenced frivolously or in bad faith.

If the proceeding on behalf of the corporation results in the corporation taking some action requested by the complainants or otherwise was successful, in whole or in part, or if anything was received by the complainants as the result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of an action or claim, the court may award the complainants reasonable expenses, including counsel fees.

The complainants shall notify the secretary of state within ten (10) days after commencing any proceeding under this section if the proceeding involves a public benefit corporation or assets held in charitable trust by a mutual benefit corporation. The secretary of state shall then notify the attorney general.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Expense warranted for ultra vires claims. —

Association members' ultra vires claim against appellee former association managers was not only not cogent, but frivolous because the exception of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-19-304(b) was not applicable in that the action was not one to enjoin any corporate act and thus the members' claims were barred under § 17-19-304(a). Furthermore, because the claims were brought in bad faith and appellants failed to cite the relevant statutory provision, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-19-630(d), appellees were entitled to reasonable expenses, including counsel fees incurred in defending that claim. Mueller v. Zimmer, 2005 WY 156, 124 P.3d 340,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2005).